Idaho, session 2025, H0246.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the moneys reappropriated to the Department of Commerce pursuant to Sections
5 through 7, Chapter 7, Laws of 2024, is hereby reduced for the Commerce Pro-
gram by the following amounts according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
Idaho Broadband
Fund $59,300 $34,766,500 $34,825,800
ARPA Capital Projects
Fund $148,400 3,887,700 102,875,200 106,911,300
Federal Grant
Fund 303,700 972,200 $148,724,000 149,999,900
TOTAL $452,100 $4,919,200 $286,365,700 $291,737,000
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 289, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Commerce for the Broadband Of-


fice Program, the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated expense classes from the listed funds for nonrecurring expenditures
for broadband infrastructure for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
Idaho Broadband
Fund $59,300 $34,766,500 $34,825,800
ARPA Capital Projects
Fund $148,400 3,887,700 102,875,200 106,911,300
Federal Grant
Fund 303,700 972,200 $148,724,000 149,999,900
TOTAL $452,100 $4,919,200 $286,365,700 $291,737,000
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
(GENERAL) FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $2,000,000 from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality (General) Fund for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Sub-
stance Abuse Treatment and Prevention Program in Section 1, Chapter 8, Laws
of 2024, from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund, is hereby reduced by $160,000
for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2024, through June
30, 2025.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 8, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Sub-
stance Abuse Treatment and Prevention Program $160,000 from the Idaho Mil-
lennium Income Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period
July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Phys-
ical Health Services Program in Section 1, Chapter 8, Laws of 2024, from the
Central Tumor Registry Fund, is hereby reduced by $240,000 for trustee and
benefit payments for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 7. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
8, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Physi-
cal Health Services Program $240,000 from the Central Tumor Registry Fund to


be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.